District of Columbia statutes.
7-1501.03

Rules.

The Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-189, § 4, 32 DCR 931
1981 Ed., § 6-2603.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-189, see Mayor’s Order 86-62, April 22, 1986.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 5-189, see Mayor’s Order 86-62, April 22, 1986.